Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-1206
Tax; security;
notice; use.

The Tax Commissioner, whenever he
or she deems it necessary to insure compliance with sections 57-1201 to 57-1214,
may require any person subject to the tax imposed by section 57-1202 to deposit
with the Tax Commissioner a suitable indemnity bond to insure payment of the
tax as the Tax Commissioner may determine. Such security may be used if it
becomes necessary to collect any tax, interest, or penalty due. Notice of
the use of the bond shall be given to such person by mail.

Laws 1983, LB 356, § 18;

Laws 2012, LB727, § 15.